Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2208.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; GIRL SCOUTS RIVER VALLEYS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education for the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Girl Scouts River Valleys. new text end new text begin (a) For a grant to Girl Scouts River Valleys leadership institute: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 500,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 500,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) The grant recipient must use grant money to support activities of the Girl Scouts River Valleys leadership institute, including but not limited to programming on healthy relationships; science, technology, engineering, and math; financial literacy; college and career readiness; leadership development; service learning; or providing internships. new text end new text begin (c) This is a onetime appropriation. new text end